pt-BR: Modelo da parte de cima do biquíni: Balconê; Bandeau; Bralette; Frente única; Gola alta; Longline; Ombro só; Decote profundo; Push-up; Top esportivo; Tomara que caia; Cortininha; Com aro; Outro
fi: Bikiniyläosan malli: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Niskalenkki; Korkea kaula-aukko; Longline; Yksiolkaiminen; Syvä uurtamus; Push-up; Urheilutoppi; Olkaimeton; Kolmio; Kaarituettu; Muu
sl-SI: Stil zgornjega dela bikinija: Balkonet; Bandeau; Bralette; Zavezovanje za vratom; Visok ovratnik; Podaljšan; Na eno ramo; Globok izrez; Push-up; Športni zgornji del; Brez naramnic; Trikotnik; S kostjo; Drugo
hu: Bikinifelső fazonja: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Nyakba akasztós; Magas nyakú; Longline; Félvállas; Mélyen dekoltált; Push-up; Sportfelső; Pánt nélküli; Háromszög; Merevítős; Egyéb
cs: Styl vrchního dílu bikin: Balkonetová; Bandeau; Braletka; Se zavazováním za krkem; S vysokým výstřihem; Prodloužená; Na jedno rameno; Hluboký výstřih; Push-up; Sportovní top; Bez ramínek; Trojúhelníková; S kosticemi; Jiné
sk-SK: Štýl vrchného dielu bikín: Balkonetka; Bandeau; Braletka; Halter (okolo krku); Ku krku; Longline (predĺžený strih); Na jedno rameno; Plunge (hlboký výstrih); Push-up; Športový top; Bez ramienok; Trojuholníkový; S kosticami; Iný
en: Bikini top style: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Halter; High-neck; Longline; One-shoulder; Plunge; Push-up; Sport top; Strapless; Triangle; Underwire; Other
th: สไตล์ของเสื้อบิกินี่: บัลคอเนต; เกาะอก; บราเล็ตต์; คล้องคอ; คอสูง; ลองไลน์; ไหล่เดี่ยว; คว้านลึก; ดันทรง; สปอร์ต; ไร้สาย; ทรงสามเหลี่ยม; มีโครง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Стил на горнището на бикини: Балконет; Бандо; Бралета; С връзки на врата; Със затворено деколте; Удължен; С едно рамо; С дълбоко деколте; Пуш-ъп; Спортно горнище; Без презрамки; Триъгълно; С банел; Други
de: Stil des Bikinioberteils: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Neckholder; High-Neck; Longline; One-Shoulder; Tiefer Ausschnitt; Push-up; Sport-Top; Trägerlos; Triangel; Bügel; Sonstige
ru: Стиль верхней части бикини: Балконет; Бандо; Бралетт; Халтер; С высоким вырезом; Удлиненный; На одно плечо; Планж; Пуш-ап; Спортивный топ; Без бретелей; Треугольник; На косточках; Другое
da: Type af bikinitop: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Halterneck; Højhalset; Longline; One-shoulder; Dyb udskæring; Push-up; Sportstop; Stropløs; Trekant; Med bøjle; Andet
ro-RO: Stilul topului de bikini: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Halter; Gât înalt; Longline; Pe un umăr; Decoltat; Push-up; Top sport; Fără bretele; Triunghi; Cu sârmă; Altele
zh-TW: 比基尼上衣樣式: 半罩杯; 平口無肩帶; 無鋼圈內衣; 繞頸; 高領; 長版; 單肩; 深 V; 集中托高; 運動上衣; 無肩帶; 三角; 有鋼圈; 其他
nb: Bikini-topp-stil: Balkonett; Bandeau; Bralette; Halterneck; Høy hals; Longline; Én skulder; Dyp utringning; Push-up; Sportstopp; Stroppeløs; Trekant; Bøyle; Annet
tr: Bikini üstü stili: Balkonet; Bando; Bralet; Boyundan bağlamalı; Yüksek yaka; Uzun kesim; Tek omuz; Derin dekolteli; Push-up; Spor üstü; Askısız; Üçgen; Balenli; Diğer
lt-LT: Bikini liemenėlės stilius: „Balconette“ tipo; „Bandeau“ tipo; „Bralette“ tipo; Surišama ant kaklo („Halter“); Aukštu kaklu; Prailginta; Ant vieno peties; Gilios iškirptės; Pakelianti („Push-up“); Sportinė; Be petnešėlių; Trikampio formos; Su lankeliais; Kita
ja: ビキニトップスタイル: バルコネット; バンドゥ; ブラレット; ホルター; ハイネック; ロングライン; ワンショルダー; プランジ; プッシュアップ; スポーツトップ; ストラップレス; トライアングル; アンダーワイヤー; その他
sv: Bikiniöverdelsstil: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Halterneck; Hög hals; Longline; Enaxlad; Djup urringning; Push-up; Sporttopp; Axellös; Triangel; Bygel; Övrigt
nl: Bikinitop stijl: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Halter; Hooggesloten; Longline; One-shoulder; Plunge; Push-up; Sporttop; Strapless; Triangel; Met beugel; Anders
el: Στυλ τοπ μπικίνι: Μπαλκονέ; Στράπλες (Bandeau); Μπραλέτ (Bralette); Δέσιμο στον λαιμό (Halter); Ψηλός λαιμός; Longline; Με έναν ώμο; Με βαθύ ντεκολτέ (Plunge); Push-up; Αθλητικό τοπ; Στράπλες; Τρίγωνο; Με μπανέλα; Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil gornjeg dijela bikinija: Balkonet; Bandeau; Bralette; Oko vrata (halter); Zatvorenog vrata (high-neck); Produženi (longline); Na jedno rame; Duboki dekolte (plunge); Push-up; Sportski top; Bez naramenica; Trokut; Sa žicom; Ostalo
ko: 비키니 탑 유형: 발코넷; 방도; 브랄렛; 홀터; 하이넥; 롱라인; 원숄더; 플런지; 푸시업; 스포츠 탑; 스트랩리스; 트라이앵글; 언더와이어; 기타
it: Top bikini: A balconcino; A fascia; Bralette; Allacciato al collo; Accollato; Longline; Monospalla; Scollatura profonda; Push-up; Top sportivo; Senza spalline; A triangolo; Con ferretto; Altro
pl: Styl góry bikini: Bardotka; Bandeau; Braletka; Halter (wiązany na szyi); Zabudowany (high-neck); Przedłużany (longline); Na jedno ramię; Głęboki dekolt; Push-up; Top sportowy; Bez ramiączek; Trójkątny; Na fiszbinach; Inny
pt-PT: Estilo da parte de cima do biquíni: Balconette; Cai-cai; Bralette; Halter; Gola alta; Longline; Ombro único; Plunge; Push-up; Top desportivo; Sem alças; Triângulo; Com aros; Outros
fr: Style de haut de bikini: Corbeille; Bandeau; Bralette; Dos nu; Col montant; Longline; Asymétrique; Plongeant; Push-up; Haut de sport; Sans bretelles; Triangle; À armatures; Autre
vi: Kiểu áo bikini: Cúp ngang; Áo quây; Bralette; Cột cổ; Cổ cao; Dáng dài; Lệch vai; Cổ sâu chữ V; Nâng ngực; Áo thể thao; Không dây; Hình tam giác; Có gọng; Khác
es: Tipo de parte superior del bikini: Balconette; Bandeau; Bralette; Halter; Cuello alto; Longline; Un hombro; Escote profundo; Push-up; Top deportivo; Sin tirantes; Triángulo; Con aros; Otro
zh-CN: 比基尼上衣款式: 半罩杯; 抹胸; 无钢圈内衣式; 挂脖; 高领; 长款; 单肩; 深 V; 聚拢型; 运动型; 无肩带; 三角杯; 带钢圈; 其他